Maryland, session 2025, HB0130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
(a) Except as provided by this section, § 1–303 of the Environment Article, and §
8–1815 of the Natural Resources Article, a prosecution for a misdemeanor shall be
instituted within 1 year after the offense was committed.
(b) Notwithstanding § 9–103(a)(3) of the Correctional Services Article or any
other provision of the Code, if a statute provides that a misdemeanor is punishable by
imprisonment in the penitentiary or that a person is subject to this subsection:
(1) The State may institute a prosecution for the misdemeanor at any time;
and
(2) For purposes of the Maryland Constitution, the person:
(i) Shall be deemed to have committed a misdemeanor whose
punishment is confinement in the penitentiary; and
(ii) May reserve a point or question for in banc review as provided
under Article IV, § 22 of the Maryland Constitution.
(JJ) A CRIMINAL PROSECUTION UNDER § 10–402(A) OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL
BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THE OFFENSE WAS COMMITTED.
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was

HOUSE BILL 130 3
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a [felony]
MISDEMEANOR and is subject to imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not
more than $10,000, or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.